src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON мс-п_0
+Det+Pos: п_0_inflect ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_SFonly_end
+Det+Interr: SF_b ;
+Det+Rel: SF_b ;

LEXICON Dem_мс-п_SFonly_end
+Det+Dem: SF_b ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_a
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_a
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Pos_мс-п_a
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;


LEXICON мс-п_a
+Det: мс-п_a_Msc ;
+Det: мс-п_a_Neu ;
+Det: мс-п_a_Fem ;
+Det: мс-п_a_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Msc
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Neu
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Fem
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_inan
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_anim
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_inananim
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Pl_mostcases
+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Nom
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Acc
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Gen
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Loc
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Dat
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс-п_a_Ins
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;
+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_b
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det+Interr: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_b
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det+Rel: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON Pos_мс-п_b
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det+Pos: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_b
+Det: мс-п_b_Msc ;
+Det: мс-п_b_Neu ;
+Det: мс-п_b_Fem ;
+Det: мс-п_b_Pl_inananim ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Msc
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Neu
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Fem
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>е́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>е́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>е́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>е́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_inan
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_anim
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_inananim
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Pl_mostcases
+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Nom
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Acc
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Gen
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>е́й # ;
+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Loc
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>е́й # ;
+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Dat
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>е́й # ;
+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b_Ins
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>е́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю # ;
+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b-либо
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Nom:-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-либо # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-либо # ;

LEXICON мс-п_b-нибудь
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Nom:-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-нибудь # ;
+Det+Indef+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-нибудь # ;


LEXICON мс-п_b-то
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Nom:-то # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-то # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-то # ;

LEXICON мс-п_весь
+Det+All: весь ;
+Det+All: всё ;
+Det+All: вся ;
+Det+All: все_anim ;
+Det+All+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:се́ # ;

LEXICON мс_все
+Pron: все_anim ;

LEXICON мс_всё
+Pron: всё ;

LEXICON весь
+Msc+Sg+Nom:е́сь # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:е́сь # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:сего́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:сего́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:сём # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:сему́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:се́м # ;

LEXICON всё
+Neu+Sg+Nom:сё # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:сё # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:сего́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:сём # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:сему́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:се́м # ;
