src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
мой:мо́й Pos_мс-п_b ;
твой:тво́й Pos_мс-п_b ;
свой:сво́й Pos_мс-п_b ;
её:её мс-п_0 ;
его:его́ мс-п_0 ;
их¹:и́х мс-п_0 ;
наш¹:на́ш Pos_мс-п_a ;
ваш:ва́ш Pos_мс-п_a ;
все:в мс_все ; ! склоняется_как_мн._одуш._от_1весь
всё:в мс_всё ; ! склоняется_как_с_ед._от_1весь
весь¹:в мс-п_весь ; ! 2*b_%tr%_мн._все,_всех,_всем;_Т._ед._м,_с_всем ;
чей:ч%^Fе́й Interr_мс-п_b ;
чей:ч%^Fе́й Rel_мс-п_b ;
кое-чей:ко̀е-ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b ;
чей-либо:ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b-либо ;
чей-нибудь:ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b-нибудь ;
чей-то:ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b-то ;
ничей:нич%^Fе́й мс-п_b ; ! § 12
кой:ко́й Interr_мс-п_a ;
кой:ко́й Rel_мс-п_a ;
никой:нико́й мс-п_a ; ! § 12
таков:тако́в Dem_мс-п_SFonly_end ;
каков:како́в Interr_мс-п_SFonly_end ;
с+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% с% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
сквозь+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% сквозь% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
исключая+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% исключа́я% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
чрез+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% чрез% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
за+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% за% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
по+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% по% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
спустя+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% спустя́% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Acc ;
поперёд+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% поперёд% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
выше+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% вы́ше% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
касательно+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% каса́тельно% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
промежду+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% проме́жду% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
после+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% по́сле% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
путём+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% путём% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
до+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% до% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Gen ;
о+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% о% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Loc ;
в+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% в% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Loc ;
на+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% на% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Loc ;
при+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% при% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Loc ;
по+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% по% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Loc ;
вопреки+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% вопреки́% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
благодаря+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% благодаря́% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
сообразно+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% сообра́зно% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
соразмерно+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% соразме́рно% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
по+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% по% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
вслед+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% вслед% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
наперерез+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% наперере́з% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Dat ;
под+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% под% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Ins ;
над+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% над% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Ins ;
перед+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% перед% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Ins ;
за+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% за% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Ins ;
по-над+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% по-над% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Ins ;
меж+Pr#ничей+Det+Neg:ни% меж% ч%^Fе́й мс-п_b_Ins ;
с+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% с% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
сквозь+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% сквозь% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
исключая+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% исключа́я% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
чрез+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% чрез% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
за+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% за% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
по+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% по% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
спустя+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% спустя́% ко́й мс-п_a_Acc ;
поперёд+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% поперёд% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
выше+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% вы́ше% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
касательно+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% каса́тельно% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
промежду+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% проме́жду% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
после+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% по́сле% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
путём+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% путём% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
до+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% до% ко́й мс-п_a_Gen ;
о+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% о% ко́й мс-п_a_Loc ;
в+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% в% ко́й мс-п_a_Loc ;
на+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% на% ко́й мс-п_a_Loc ;
при+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% при% ко́й мс-п_a_Loc ;
по+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% по% ко́й мс-п_a_Loc ;
вопреки+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% вопреки́% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
благодаря+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% благодаря́% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
сообразно+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% сообра́зно% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
соразмерно+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% соразме́рно% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
по+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% по% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
вслед+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% вслед% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
наперерез+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% наперере́з% ко́й мс-п_a_Dat ;
под+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% под% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
над+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% над% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
пред+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% пред% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
перед+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% перед% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
за+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% за% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
по-над+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% по-над% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
меж+Pr#никой+Det+Neg:ни% меж% ко́й мс-п_a_Ins ;
